Idaho statutes. Title 55 PROPERTY IN GENERAL
Chapter 17
COORDINATE SYSTEM OF LAND DESCRIPTION

Sec.

§ 55-1701. Establishing coordinate system — Designating zones.

The system of plane coordinates which has been established by the national ocean service/national geodetic survey, or its successors, for defining and stating the positions or locations of points within the state of Idaho is to be known and designated as the “Idaho coordinate system of 1983.” On and after January 1, 1996, only the “Idaho coordinate system of 1983” shall be used.

For the purpose of the use of this system the state is either divided into an “east zone,” a “central zone,” and a “west zone” or alternatively, a state comprehensive “single zone.”

The area included in the following counties shall constitute the east zone: Bannock, Bear Lake, Bingham, Bonneville, Caribou, Clark, Franklin, Fremont, Jefferson, Madison, Oneida, Power and Teton.

The area included in the following counties shall constitute the central zone: Blaine, Butte, Camas, Cassia, Custer, Gooding, Jerome, Lemhi, Lincoln, Minidoka and Twin Falls.

The area included in the following counties shall constitute the west zone: Ada, Adams, Benewah, Boise, Bonner, Boundary, Canyon, Clearwater, Elmore, Gem, Idaho, Kootenai, Latah, Lewis, Nez Perce, Owyhee, Payette, Shoshone, Valley and Washington.

The area included within the boundaries of the state of Idaho shall constitute the single zone.

§ 55-1702. Zone references.

As established for use in the east zone, the Idaho coordinate system of 1983 shall be named, and in any document in which it is used it shall be designated the “Idaho coordinate system of 1983, east zone.”

As established for use in the central zone, the Idaho coordinate system of 1983 shall be named, and in any document in which it is used it shall be designated the “Idaho coordinate system of 1983, central zone.”

As established for use in the west zone, the Idaho coordinate system of 1983 shall be named, and in any document in which it is used it shall be designated the “Idaho coordinate system of 1983, west zone.”

As established for use in the single zone, the Idaho coordinate system of 1983 shall be named, and in any document in which it is used it shall be designated the “Idaho coordinate system of 1983, single zone.”

§ 55-1703. Plane coordinates.

The plane coordinates to be used in expressing the position or location of a point in the appropriate zone of this system, shall consist of two (2) distances expressed in meters and decimals of a meter or in United States survey feet and decimals of a foot when using the Idaho coordinate system of 1983. For conversion purposes, one (1) United States survey foot equals one thousand two hundred (1,200) divided by three thousand nine hundred thirty-seven (3,937) meters. One (1) of these distances, to be known as “northing” or “N” shall give the position in a north-and-south direction; the other, to be known as the “easting” or “E” shall give the position in an east-and-west direction. These coordinates shall be made to depend upon and conform to the plane rectangular coordinate values of the national spatial reference system as maintained and provided by the national ocean service/national geodetic survey or its successors.

§ 55-1704. Documents reporting coordinates within two zones.

When any document reports coordinates that lie within two (2) coordinate zones, the coordinates of all points shall refer to one (1) of the zones which shall be named in the document.

§ 55-1705. Zone definitions.

For the purpose of more precisely defining the Idaho coordinate system of 1983, the following definitions are adopted:

The Idaho coordinate system of 1983, east zone, is a transverse mercator projection of the North American datum of 1983 based on the geodetic reference system of 1980 (GRS 80), having a central meridian 112°10′ west of Greenwich, which meridian has a reduced scale of one (1) part in nineteen thousand (19,000). The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 112°10′ west of Greenwich and the parallel 41°40′ north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: N=0 meters and E=200,000 meters.

The Idaho coordinate system of 1983, central zone, is a transverse mercator projection of the North American datum of 1983 based on the geodetic reference system of 1980 (GRS 80), having a central meridian 114°00′ west of Greenwich, which meridian has a reduced scale of one (1) part in nineteen thousand (19,000). The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 114°00′ west of Greenwich and the parallel 41°40′ north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: N=0 meters and E=500,000 meters.

The Idaho coordinate system of 1983, west zone, is a transverse mercator projection of the North American datum of 1983 based on the geodetic reference system of 1980 (GRS 80), having a central meridian 115°45′ west of Greenwich, which meridian has a reduced scale of one (1) part in fifteen thousand (15,000). The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 115°45′ west of Greenwich and the parallel 41°40′ north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: N=0 meters and E=800,000 meters.

The Idaho coordinate system of 1983, single zone, is a transverse mercator projection of the North American datum of 1983 based on the geodetic reference system of 1980 (GRS 80), having a central meridian 114°00′ west of Greenwich, which meridian has a reduced scale of one (1) part in two thousand five hundred (2,500). The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 114°00′ west of Greenwich and the parallel 42°00′ north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: N=1,200,000 meters and E=2,500,000 meters.

§ 55-1706. Five kilometer triangulation limitation. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 256, § 8, effective July 1, 2010.

§ 55-1707. Use of term. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 256, § 9, effective July 1, 2010.

§ 55-1708. Coordinate descriptions supplemental.

Whenever coordinates based on the Idaho coordinate system are used to describe any tract of land which in the same document is also described by reference to any subdivision, line or corner of the United States public land surveys, the description by coordinates shall be construed as supplemental to the basic description of such subdivision, line or corner contained in the official plats and field notes of the United States public land surveys filed of record, and in the event of any conflict the description by reference to the subdivision, line or corner of the United States public land surveys shall prevail over the description by coordinates unless said coordinates are upheld by adjudication, at which time the coordinate description shall prevail. Every recorded map, survey or conveyance or other instrument affecting title to real property which delineates, describes or refers to such property or any part thereof by reference to coordinates based upon the designated Idaho coordinate system shall also describe the property by reference and tie to either section corner or quarter corner monuments of the United States public land surveys.

§ 55-1709. Description by coordinate not mandatory.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall require any purchaser or mortgagee of real property to rely wholly on a land description, any part of which depends exclusively upon the designated Idaho coordinate system.